Utah statutes.
17-50-327.   Regulation of carbon monoxide detectors -- Enforcement against occupant only.

(1)  Subject to Subsection (2), a county may not enforce an ordinance, rule, or regulation requiring the installation or maintenance of a carbon monoxide detector in a residential dwelling against anyone other than the occupant of the dwelling.

(2)  Subsection (1) may not be construed to affect:

(a)  a building permit applicant's obligation to comply with a building code that requires the installation of a carbon monoxide detector as part of new construction; or

(b)  a county's ability to require a building permit applicant to comply with a building code that requires the installation of a carbon monoxide detector as part of new construction.



Enacted by Chapter 304, 2009 General Session

